hr-HR: Materijal baze stola: Aluminij; Mjed; Beton; Staklo; Željezo; Mramor; Metal; Ratan; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Kamen; Drvo; Ostalo
ru: Материал основания стола: Алюминий; Латунь; Бетон; Стекло; Железо; Мрамор; Металл; Ротанг; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Камень; Дерево; Другое
es: Material de la base de la mesa: Aluminio; Latón; Concreto; Vidrio; Hierro; Mármol; Metal; Ratán; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Piedra; Madera; Otro
zh-CN: 桌底座材质: 铝; 黄铜; 混凝土; 玻璃; 铁; 大理石; 金属; 藤; 不锈钢; 钢; 石材; 木材; 其他
ro-RO: Material al bazei mesei: Aluminiu; Alamă; Beton; Sticlă; Fier; Marmură; Metal; Ratan; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Piatră; Lemn; Altele
en: Table base material: Aluminum; Brass; Concrete; Glass; Iron; Marble; Metal; Rattan; Stainless steel; Steel; Stone; Wood; Other
ko: 테이블 베이스 소재: 알루미늄; 황동; 콘크리트; 유리; 철; 대리석; 금속; 라탄; 스테인리스 스틸; 스틸; 석재; 목재; 기타
da: Materiale i bordbase: Aluminium; Messing; Beton; Glas; Jern; Marmor; Metal; Rattan; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Sten; Træ; Andet
pt-BR: Materiais de base da mesa: Alumínio; Latão; Concreto; Vidro; Ferro; Mármore; Metal; Rattan; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Pedra; Madeira; Outro
sv: Material för bordsunderrede: Aluminium; Mässing; Betong; Glas; Järn; Marmor; Metall; Rotting; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Sten; Trä; Annat
it: Materiale della base del tavolo: Alluminio; Ottone; Cemento; Vetro; Ferro; Marmo; Metallo; Rattan; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Pietra; Legno; Altro
nl: Materiaal tafelbasis: Aluminium; Messing; Beton; Glas; IJzer; Marmer; Metaal; Rotan; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Steen; Hout; Overig
sk-SK: Základný materiál stola: Hliník; Mosadz; Betón; Sklo; Železo; Mramor; Kov; Ratan; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Kameň; Drevo; Iný
tr: Masa taban malzemesi: Alüminyum; Pirinç; Beton; Cam; Demir; Mermer; Metal; Rattan; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Taş; Ahşap; Diğer
pt-PT: Material da base da mesa: Alumínio; Latão; Betão; Vidro; Ferro; Mármore; Metal; Rattan; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Pedra; Madeira; Outro
vi: Chất liệu chân bàn: Nhôm; Đồng thau; Bê tông; Kính; Sắt; Cẩm thạch; Kim loại; Mây; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Đá; Gỗ; Khác
pl: Materiał podstawy stołu: Aluminium; Mosiądz; Beton; Szkło; Żelazo; Marmur; Metal; Rattan; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Kamień; Drewno; Inny
el: Υλικό βάσης τραπεζιού: Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Τσιμέντο; Γυαλί; Σίδηρος; Μάρμαρο; Μέταλλο; Ρατάν; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Ατσάλι; Πέτρα; Ξύλο; Άλλο
hu: Asztal alapjának anyaga: Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Beton; Üveg; Vas; Márvány; Fém; Rattan; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Kő; Fa; Egyéb
lt-LT: Stalo pagrindo medžiaga: Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Betonas; Stiklas; Geležis; Marmuras; Metalas; Ratanas; Nerūdijantis plienas; Plienas; Akmuo; Mediena; Kita
zh-TW: 桌腳座材質: 鋁製; 黃銅; 混凝土; 玻璃; 鐵製; 大理石; 金屬; 藤製; 不鏽鋼; 鋼製; 石製; 木製; 其他
cs: Materiál podstavce stolu: Hliník; Mosaz; Beton; Sklo; Železo; Mramor; Kov; Ratan; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Kámen; Dřevo; Jiné
fr: Table base material: Aluminium; Laiton; Béton; Verre; Fer; Marbre; Métal; Rotin; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Pierre; Bois; Autre
de: Material der Tischbeine: Aluminium; Messing; Beton; Glas; Eisen; Marmor; Metall; Rattan; Edelstahl; Stahl; Stein; Holz; Sonstige
sl-SI: Material podstavka mize: Aluminij; Medenina; Beton; Steklo; Železo; Marmor; Kovina; Ratan; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Kamen; Les; Drugo
nb: Materiale i bordbase: Aluminium; Messing; Betong; Glass; Jern; Marmor; Metall; Rotting; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Stein; Tre; Annet
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำฐานโต๊ะ: อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; คอนกรีต; กระจก; เหล็ก; หินอ่อน; โลหะ; หวาย; สเตนเลสสตีล; เหล็กกล้า; หิน; ไม้; อื่นๆ
fi: Pöydän pohjamateriaali: Alumiini; Messinki; Betoni; Lasi; Rauta; Marmori; Metalli; Rottinki; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Kivi; Puu; Muu
ja: テーブル基材: アルミニウム; 真鍮; コンクリート; ガラス; 鉄; 大理石; メタル; ラタン; ステンレススチール; スチール; 石材; 木; その他
bg-BG: Материал на основата на масата: Алуминий; Месинг; Бетон; Стъкло; Желязо; Мрамор; Метал; Ратан; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Камък; Дърво; Друго